lt-LT: Kastanjetų tipas: Klasikinės / koncertinės; Flamenko; Liaudies / tradicinės; Orkestro; Kita
da: Type kastagnetter: Klassisk/Koncert; Flamenco; Folk/Traditionel; Orkester; Andet
th: ประเภทกรับสเปน: คลาสสิก/คอนเสิร์ต; ฟลาเมงโก; พื้นบ้าน/ดั้งเดิม; ออร์เคสตรา; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de castaniete: Clasice/Concert; Flamenco; Folk/Tradiționale; Orchestrale; Altele
ja: カスタネットタイプ: クラシック/コンサート; フラメンコ; 民俗/伝統; オーケストラ; その他
vi: Loại castanet: Cổ điển/Hòa nhạc; Flamenco; Dân gian/Truyền thống; Dàn nhạc; Khác
de: Art der Kastagnetten: Klassik/Konzert; Flamenco; Folk/Traditionell; Orchester; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Вид кастанети: Класически/концертни; Фламенко; Фолклорни/традиционни; Оркестрови; Други
cs: Typ kastanět: Klasické/koncertní; Flamencové; Folkové/tradiční; Orchestrální; Jiné
ko: 캐스터네츠 유형: 클래식/콘서트; 플라멩코; 포크/전통; 오케스트라; 기타
pl: Typ kastanietów: Klasyczne/koncertowe; Flamenco; Folkowe/tradycyjne; Orkiestrowe; Inne
zh-CN: 响板类型: 古典/音乐会; 弗拉门戈; 民俗/传统; 管弦乐; 其他
nb: Kastanjett-type: Klassisk/konsert; Flamenco; Folk/tradisjonell; Orkester; Annet
hu: Kasztanyetta típusa: Klasszikus / Koncert; Flamenco; Népi / Hagyományos; Zenekari; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ kastanety: Klasické/koncertné; Flamenco; Ľudové/tradičné; Orchestrálne; Iné
el: Τύπος καστανιέτας: Κλασικές/Συναυλίας; Φλαμένκο; Παραδοσιακές; Ορχηστρικές; Άλλο
en: Castanets type: Classical/Concert; Flamenco; Folk/Traditional; Orchestral; Other
nl: Castanets type: Klassiek/Concert; Flamenco; Folk/Traditioneel; Orkestraal; Overig
it: Nacchere tipo: Classica/Concerto; Flamenco; Folk/Tradizionale; Orchestrale; Altro
fr: Type de castagnettes: Classique/Concert; Flamenco; Folk/Traditionnelle; Orchestrale; Autre
tr: Kastanyet tipi: Klasik/Konser; Flamenko; Folklorik/Geleneksel; Orkestra; Diğer
es: Tipo de castañuelas: Clásicas/concierto; Flamenco; Folclóricas/tradicionales; Orquestales; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta kastanjete: Klasične / koncertne; Flamenco; Folklorne / tradicionalne; Orkestralne; Ostalo
ru: Тип кастаньет: Классические/концертные; Фламенко; Народные/традиционные; Оркестровые; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de castanholas: Clássicas/concerto; Flamenco; Folk/tradicionais; Orquestra; Outro
sv: Typ av kastanjetter: Klassisk/konsert; Flamenco; Folk/traditionell; Orkester; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de castanholas: Clássicas/concerto; Flamenco; Folk/tradicionais; Orquestrais; Outras
sl-SI: Vrsta kastanjet: Klasične/koncertne; Flamenko; Ljudske/tradicionalne; Orkestralne; Drugo
fi: Kastanjettityyppi: Klassinen/konsertti; Flamenco; Kansanmusiikki/perinteinen; Orkesteri; Muu
zh-TW: 響板類型: 古典/音樂會; 佛朗明哥; 民俗/傳統; 管弦樂; 其他